Colorado statutes. TITLE 2 Legislative
PART 15
LEGISLATIVE TASK FORCE ON THE BUSINESS
PERSONAL PROPERTY TAX

2-2-1501. Legislative task force on the business personal property tax - creation - duties - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire part added, (SB 09-085), ch. 431, p. 2394, § 1, effective June 4.

Editor's note:

Subsection (6) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2010. (See L. 2009, p. 2394.)